Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-186
Bank; possession; voluntary surrender to department; notice; posting; liens dissolved.

Any bank may place its affairs and assets under the control of the department by posting on its door the following notice: This bank is in the hands of the Department of Banking and Finance. The posting of such notice, or the taking possession of any bank by the department or by any financial institution examiner shall be sufficient to place all of its assets of whatever nature immediately in the possession of the department, and shall operate as a bar to the levying of attachments or executions thereon, and shall operate to dissolve and release all levies, judgment liens, attachments, or other liens obtained through legal proceedings within sixty days next preceding the posting of such notice or the taking possession of such bank by the department.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 43, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 322;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 43, p. 703;

C.S.1922, § 8023;

C.S.1929, § 8-170;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 40, p. 156;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-170;

R.S.1943, § 8-172;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 86, p. 168;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 83.